root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
flag *B:
   E    > -E,Eš
   [^CJ]E    > -E,U
   CE    > -E,I
   JE    > -E,I
   E    > -E,EME
   E    > -E,ETE
   [^CJ]E    > -E,OU
   CE    > -CE,TěJí
   JE    > -E,í
   CE    > -CE,TěJ
   CE    > -CE,TěJME
   CE    > -CE,TěJTE
   [RS]E    > -E,
   [RS]E    > -E,ME
   [RS]E    > -E,TE
   [^áíL]žE    > -žE,ž
   ížE    > -ížE,Iž
   ážE    > -ážE,Až
   LžE    > -žE,žI
   [^á]čE    > -čE,č
   áčE    > -čE,č
   řE    > -řE,řI
   [^í]šE    > -šE,š
   íšE    > -íšE,Iš
   JE    > -JE,J
   VE    > -E,I
   NE    > -NE,ň
   [^S]TE    > -TE,ť
   [AE]DE    > -DE,ď
   [^EA]DE    > -DE,DI
   [^čžšTNCDV]E    > -E,TE
   [^čžšTNCDV]E    > -E,ME
   [^í]šE    > -šE,šME
   [^í]šE    > -šE,šTE
   íšE    > -íšE,IšME
   íšE    > -íšE,IšTE
   [^áíL]žE    > -žE,žME
   [^áíL]žE    > -žE,žTE
   ížE    > -ížE,IžME
   ížE    > -ížE,IžTE
   ážE    > -ážE,AžME
   ážE    > -ážE,AžTE
   LžE    > ME
   LžE    > TE
   [^á]čE    > -čE,čME
   [^á]čE    > -čE,čTE
   áčE    > -áčE,AčME
   áčE    > -áčE,AčTE
   [^EA]DE    > -DE,DěME
   [^EA]DE    > -DE,DěTE
   [AE]DE    > -DE,ďME
   [AE]DE    > -DE,ďTE
   NE    > -NE,ňME
   NE    > -NE,ňTE
   [^S]TE    > -TE,ťME
   [^S]TE    > -TE,ťTE
   VE    > -E,ěME
   VE    > -E,ěTE
   [^ďťň]U    > -U,Eš
   [^ďťň]U    > -U,E
   [^ďťň]U    > -U,EME
   [^ďťň]U    > -U,ETE
   U    > -U,OU
   ňU    > -ňU,Něš
   ňU    > -ňU,Ně
   ňU    > -ňU,NěME
   ňU    > -ňU,NěTE
   LžU    > -U,I
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěž]U    > -U,I
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][BDFMNPTVW]U    > -U,ěME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSšZ]U    > -U,EME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][BDFMNPTVW]U    > -U,ěTE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSšZ]U    > -U,ETE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]DU    > -DU,ď
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]DU    > -DU,ďME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]DU    > -DU,ďTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NU    > -NU,ň
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NU    > -NU,ňME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NU    > -NU,ňTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]TU    > -TU,ť
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]TU    > -TU,ťME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]TU    > -TU,ťTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSZ]U    > -U,
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSZ]U    > -U,ME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSZ]U    > -U,TE
   íšU    > -íšU,Iš
   íšU    > -íšU,IšME
   íšU    > -íšU,IšTE
   [^T]I    > -I,Eš
   [^T]I    > -I,Eš
   [^T]I    > -I,E
   [^T]I    > -I,EME
   [^T]I    > -I,ETE
   [^T]I    > -I,í
   JI    > -I,
   JI    > -I,ME
   JI    > -I,TE
   íM    > -M,š
   íM    > -M,
   íM    > E
   íM    > -M,TE
   žíM    > -íM,
   žíM    > -íM,ME
   žíM    > -íM,TE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]íM    > -íM,I
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][BDFMNPTVW]íM    > -íM,ěME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSšZ]íM    > -íM,EME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][BDFMNPTVW]íM    > -íM,ěTE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][CčGHJKLRřSšZ]íM    > -íM,ETE
   OJíM    > -OJíM,ůJ
   OJíM    > -OJíM,ůJME
   OJíM    > -OJíM,ůJTE
   [AáěíUý]T    > I
   íT    > -íT,IJI
   íT    > -íT,IJEš
   íT    > -íT,IJE
   íT    > -íT,IJEME
   íT    > -íT,IJETE
   íT    > -íT,IJí
   íT    > -íT,IJ
   íT    > -íT,IJME
   íT    > -íT,IJTE
   íT    > -íT,IL
   íT    > -íT,ILA
   íT    > -íT,ILO
   íT    > -íT,ILI
   íT    > -íT,ILY
   ěT    > -T,JI
   ěT    > -T,JEš
   ěT    > -T,JE
   ěT    > -T,JEME
   ěT    > -T,JETE
   ěT    > -T,Jí
   ěT    > -T,J
   ěT    > -T,JME
   ěT    > -T,JTE
   ET    > -T,JI
   ET    > -T,JEš
   ET    > -T,JE
   ET    > -T,JEME
   ET    > -T,JETE
   ET    > -T,Jí
   ET    > -T,J
   ET    > -T,JME
   ET    > -T,JTE
   ýT    > -ýT,YJI
   ýT    > -ýT,YJEš
   ýT    > -ýT,YJE
   ýT    > -ýT,YJEME
   ýT    > -ýT,YJETE
   ýT    > -ýT,YJí
   ýT    > -ýT,YJ
   ýT    > -ýT,YJME
   ýT    > -ýT,YJTE
   ýT    > -ýT,YL
   ýT    > -ýT,YLA
   ýT    > -ýT,YLO
   ýT    > -ýT,YLI
   ýT    > -ýT,YLY
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJI
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJEš
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJE
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJEME
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJETE
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJí
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJ
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJME
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJTE
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJíC
   [^BPVMNřD]áT    > -áT,AJíCE
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJI
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJEš
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJE
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJEME
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJETE
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJí
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJ
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJME
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJTE
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJíC
   [BPVMN]áT    > -áT,ěJíCE
   DáT    > I
   DáT    > -T,M
   DáT    > -T,š
   DáT    > -T,
   DáT    > -T,ME
   DáT    > -T,TE
   DáT    > -áT,AJí
   DáT    > -áT,EJ
   DáT    > -áT,EJME
   DáT    > -áT,EJTE
   řáT    > -áT,EJI
   řáT    > -áT,EJEš
   řáT    > -áT,EJE
   řáT    > -áT,EJEME
   řáT    > -áT,EJETE
   řáT    > -áT,EJí
   řáT    > -áT,EJ
   řáT    > -áT,EJME
   řáT    > -áT,EJTE
   řáT    > -áT,EJíC
   řáT    > -áT,EJíCE
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJI
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJEš
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJE
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJEME
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJETE
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJí
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJ
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJME
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UJTE
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,UL
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,ULA
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,ULO
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,ULI
   [^M]OUT    > -OUT,ULY
   MOUT    > -OUT,U
   MOUT    > -OUT,Eš
   MOUT    > -OUT,E
   MOUT    > -OUT,EME
   MOUT    > -OUT,ETE
   MOUT    > -T,
   MOUT    > -OUT,I
   MOUT    > -OUT,ěME
   MOUT    > -OUT,ěTE
   TAT    > -T,NU
   TAT    > -T,NEš
   TAT    > -T,NE
   TAT    > -T,NEME
   TAT    > -T,NETE
   TAT    > -T,NOU
   TAT    > -T,ň
   TAT    > -T,ňME
   TAT    > -T,ňTE
   PAT    > -AT,íM
   PAT    > -AT,íš
   PAT    > -AT,í
   PAT    > -AT,íME
   PAT    > -AT,íTE
   PAT    > -AT,I
   PAT    > -AT,ěME
   PAT    > -AT,ěTE
   RAT    > -RAT,řU
   RAT    > -RAT,řEš
   RAT    > -RAT,řE
   RAT    > -RAT,řEME
   RAT    > -RAT,řETE
   RAT    > -RAT,řOU
   RAT    > -RAT,ř
   RAT    > -RAT,řME
   RAT    > -RAT,řTE
   [AáEě]T    > I
   [AáEě]T    > -T,L
   [AáEě]T    > -T,LA
   [AáEě]T    > -T,LO
   [AáEě]T    > -T,LI
   [AáEě]T    > -T,LY

flag *O:
   [OS]TEN    > -EN,NA
   [OS]TEN    > -EN,NO
   [OS]TEN    > -EN,NI
   [OS]TEN    > -EN,NY
   [OS]TEN    > -EN,NU
   [^OS]TEN    > A
   [^OS]TEN    > O
   [^OS]TEN    > I
   [^OS]TEN    > Y
   [^OS]TEN    > U
   [BCMNPJ]EN    > -EN,NA
   [BCMNPJ]EN    > -EN,NO
   [BCMNPJ]EN    > -EN,NI
   [BCMNPJ]EN    > -EN,NY
   [BCMNPJ]EN    > -EN,NU
   [^TBCMNPJ]EN    > A
   [^TBCMNPJ]EN    > O
   [^TBCMNPJ]EN    > I
   [^TBCMNPJ]EN    > Y
   [^TBCMNPJ]EN    > U
   [^E]N    > A
   [^E]N    > O
   [^E]N    > I
   [^E]N    > Y
   [^E]N    > U
   [^NLVý]    > A
   [^NLVý]    > O
   [^NLVýGHKR]    > I
   [^NLVý]    > Y
   [^NLVý]    > U
   K    > -K,CI
   R    > -R,řI
   [^E]L    > A
   [^E]L    > O
   [^E]L    > I
   [^E]L    > Y
   [^š]EL    > A
   [^š]EL    > O
   [^š]EL    > I
   [^š]EL    > Y
   šEL    > -EL,LA
   šEL    > -EL,LO
   šEL    > -EL,LI
   šEL    > -EL,LY
   EV    > -EV,VA
   EV    > -EV,VO
   EV    > -EV,VI
   EV    > -EV,VY
   EV    > -EV,VU
   [^E]V    > A
   [^E]V    > O
   [^E]V    > I
   [^E]V    > Y
   [^E]V    > U
   ý    > -ý,O

flag *X:
   A    > -A,OUC
   A    > -A,OUCE
   E    > -E,íC
   E    > -E,íCE
   ě    > -ě,íC
   ě    > -ě,íCE
   [DV]    > šI
   [DV]    > šE
   ET    > šI
   ET    > šE
   OUT    > -OUT,UV
   OUT    > -OUT,UVšI
   OUT    > -OUT,UVšE
   [AI]T    > -T,V
   [AI]T    > -T,VšI
   [AI]T    > -T,VšE
   ýT    > -ýT,YV
   ýT    > -ýT,YVšI
   ýT    > -ýT,YVšE
