root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
bezvzdušný/YKRO
blit/ON
bouřlivý/YKRON
čít/BN
čit/ON
děl/ON
dobit/ON
doblít/BN
dobrat/ATXN
dohnal/ON
dohnít/BN
dohudl/ON
dochvět/BN
dojda/XN
dojet/ION
dokapu/BN
dokontrolovat/ATXN
dokoušu/BN
domelu/BN
domlel/ON
dooděju/BN
dooděn/ON
dopaden/ON
dopět/B
dopleji/BN
dopovězen/ON
dorazit/ACXN
dorostl/ON
dorýt/BTN
dořeknut/ON
dořeknuv/XN
dosečen/ON
doseji/BN
dosil/ON
dostat/BN
dostoupit/ATXN
dostupen/ON
došít/BTN
dotepu/BN
dotra/XN
dotřásl/ON
doučím/BN
dovát/BON
dováži/BN
dovlekl/ON
dovybrat/ATXN
dovýt/BN
doznat/JTXN
dožnu/BN
dra/XN
drouboučký/YRON
hladov/O
hnán/ON
hřát/BN
hudl/ON
chtěje/XN
chtěn/ON
chtě/XN
jat/ON
jda/XN
jdu/BN
jist/ON
jsa/XN
kát/BN
klidný/YKRON
klubu/BN
krýt/BTN
lačný/YKRON
lha/XN
lhostejný/YKRO
líný/YRO
lžu/BN
maje/XN
malinký/YKO
měkký/YKRON
měnit/ATXN
měnlivý/YKRON
mlád/O
mocen/ON
mra/XN
mrzut/ON
nabít/BN
nabit/ON
nabrat/ATXN
nadehnal/ON
nadejda/XN
nadejdu/BN
nadepsán/ON
nadeženu/BN
nadra/XN
nahlédnout/ATXN
nahnal/ON
nahrát/BTN
najat/ON
najda/XN
najmu/BN
nakritizoval/ON
nalít/BN
nalit/ON
namyšlen/ON
napíši/BN
napit/ON
naplet/ON
naplout/BN
naprostý/YO
narazit/ACXN
nařekl/ON
nasát/BON
nastál/ON
nastelu/BN
nastoupit/ATXN
natra/XN
natřesu/BN
naveden/ON
naznat/JTXN
nazout/BTN
nerad/O
obehrát/BTN
obejda/XN
obeplout/BTN
obeslal/ON
obestoupit/ATXN
obhlédnout/ATXN
obhlídnout/ATXN
obít/BN
oblačný/YKRON
oblít/BN
obměnit/ATXN
obrýt/BTN
obstarán/ON
obstoupit/ATXN
obvít/BN
oddra/XN
odebrat/ATXN
odedra/XN
odehrát/BTN
odejda/XN
odejel/ON
odejmu/BN
odepíšu/BN
odepsal/ON
odestojím/BN
odestoupit/ATXN
odchýlit/ATXN
odjedu/BN
odkázán/ON
odkrýt/BTN
odměnit/ATXN
odra/XN
odrostl/ON
odrostu/BN
odřeknuv/XN
odstonal/ON
odstoupit/ATXN
odstůňu/BN
odumra/XN
odvát/BON
odvlekl/ON
odvýt/BN
ojedu/BN
okřát/BN
opíšu/BN
opit/ON
orazit/ACXN
oset/ON
oškubu/BN
otra/XN
ovát/BON
ovit/ON
ožehnout/ATXN
oženu/BN
píši/BN
pjal/ON
plout/BN
plovaje/XN
pobit/ON
poblahopřát/BTN
pobrat/ATXN
podebrat/ATXN
podejda/XN
podejdu/BN
podepíši/BN
podepsal/ON
podetnu/BN
podlit/ON
podrazit/ACXN
podrýt/BTN
podstoupit/ATXN
podupu/BN
podveden/ON
pojda/XN
pojdu/BN
poklidný/YKRON
pokornět/AJTXN
pokoušu/BN
pokovit/ATXN
polít/BN
pomlel/ON
pomra/XN
pomýlit/ATXN
ponesu/BN
poodstoupit/ATXN
pookřát/BN
popít/BN
popit/ON
popojda/XN
poporostu/BN
popsán/ON
porazit/ACXN
porostu/BN
posmát/BN
postál/ON
postojím/BN
potáži/BN
potra/XN
poučil/ON
poudím/BN
pováži/BN
povinován/ON
povstat/BN
povyrazit/ACXN
pozměnit/ATXN
poznat/JTXN
požat/ON
požít/BTN
probrat/ATXN
procupu/BN
prodra/XN
prohlédnout/ATXN
prohlídnout/ATXN
prohnán/ON
prohřát/BON
projda/XN
projmu/BN
proklet/ON
proklubu/BN
prokovit/ATXN
prolít/BN
proměnit/ATXN
propásl/ON
propasu/BN
propleji/BN
prorazit/ACXN
prořečen/ON
prořeknu/BN
prořeknuv/XN
prospat/BTN
prost/O
prostoupit/ATXN
prošít/BTN
protra/XN
proučil/ON
provýt/BN
přebrat/ATXN
předaleký/YO
předejda/XN
předejmu/BN
předemlet/ON
předlouhý/YRO
předrazit/ACXN
předstoupit/ATXN
předšít/BTN
předvybrat/ATXN
přehlédnout/ATXN
přehlídnout/ATXN
přehřát/BON
přechýlit/ATXN
přejda/XN
přejmu/BN
překontrolovat/ATXN
přemelu/BN
přeměnit/ATXN
přemlel/ON
přepsán/ON
přerazit/ACXN
přeřeknu/BN
přeřeknuv/XN
přeset/ON
přestoupit/ATXN
přetnu/BN
přetnul/ON
přetra/XN
převzal/ON
přeženu/BN
přibrat/ATXN
přijat/ON
přijda/XN
přijmu/BN
přioděju/BN
přioděn/ON
přirazit/ACXN
přirostl/ON
přiseču/BN
přistál/ON
přistoupit/ATXN
přitra/XN
přivedu/BN
přivlekl/ON
přiznat/JTXN
razit/ACXN
rostl/ON
rozebrat/ATXN
rozedra/XN
rozehrát/BTN
rozejda/XN
rozepsal/ON
rozesmát/BN
rozestoupit/ATXN
rozetra/XN
rozeznat/JTXN
rozežnu/BN
rozhlédnout/ATXN
rozhlídnout/ATXN
rozjet/ION
rozkrýt/BTN
rozměnit/ATXN
rozpoznat/JTXN
rozptýlit/ATXN
rozrazit/ACXN
rozříznutý/YRON
rozstoupit/ATXN
rozstůňu/BN
rozťat/ON
rozvržu/BN
rozžat/ON
rozžav/XN
řeknuv/XN
řka/XN
sát/ON
sedra/XN
sehrát/BTN
sel/ON
sepsout/BTN
seslal/ON
sestoupit/ATXN
seznat/JTXN
sežnu/BN
schýlit/ATXN
sil/ON
slit/ON
slout/BN
spal/ON
splout/BTN
srazit/ACXN
sřekl/ON
stonal/ON
stůňu/BN
svedl/ON
ťal/ON
táži/BN
tra/XN
třesen/ON
udát/BN
udra/XN
uhnán/ON
ujda/XN
ujmu/BN
ujmut/ON
ulít/BN
upsán/ON
urazit/ACXN
usebrat/ATXN
uspat/BTN
ušel/ON
utra/XN
uváži/BN
uviděl/ON
valuta/ZXQ
váži/BN
veden/ON
vejda/XN
veselý/YKRON
vetnu/BN
vida/XN
vjet/ION
vlít/BN
vrazit/ACXN
vrozen/ON
vybít/BN
vybit/ON
vybrat/ATXN
vyhlédnout/ATXN
vyhřát/BON
vychýlit/ATXN
vyjel/ON
vykout/BTN
vyměnit/ATXN
vymlel/ON
vynasmát/BN
vypásl/ON
vypsán/ON
vyrazit/ACXN
vyrostu/BN
vysel/ON
vyspat/BTN
vystlal/ON
vytát/BTN
vytra/XN
vyvát/BON
vyvedu/BN
vzat/ON
vzejda/XN
vzejdu/BN
zabit/ON
zadra/XN
zadupu/BN
zajal/ON
zajda/XN
zajedu/BN
zalhán/ON
zamelu/BN
zapjat/ON
zarazit/ACXN
zarostu/BN
zařekl/ON
zaspat/BTN
zašel/ON
zatra/XN
zatřesu/BN
zavát/BON
zavýt/BN
zažat/ON
zdát/BN
zemra/XN
zhlédnout/ATXN
zkontrolovat/ATXN
zmaten/ON
zmatu/BN
zmýlit/ATXN
zřejmý/YKRON
zřeknu/BN
zřeknuv/XN
ženat/ON
